Tennessee statutes. Title 33 Mental Health and Substance Abuse and Intellectual and Developmental Disabilities
Part 3

Transfers of Residential Service Recipients

33-3-301. Transfer between facilities.

The commissioner may authorize the transfer of a person in a facility of the department to another department facility or to a private facility under this section. The commissioner shall give due consideration to the relationship of the person to family, guardian, conservator, and friends so as to maintain relationships and encourage visitation beneficial to the person. If a person whose transfer is authorized has been admitted or committed by court order, a certified copy of the court order shall be sent to the facility to which the person is transferred.

If the commissioner determines that a person could more properly be cared for and treated in a facility other than the one in which the person is a service recipient and that the transfer is in the person’s best interest, the commissioner may authorize the person to be transferred for an indefinite period to another department facility. The person may be transferred to a secure facility, if, and only if, in addition, the commissioner determines that the person is substantially likely to injure the person or others if not treated in a secure facility. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, any transfer to a developmental center authorized under this section shall not exceed forty-five (45) days unless the transfer complies with department rules.

Before a transfer is authorized, the person shall be given a physical examination by a licensed physician and a mental assessment and evaluation by a qualified professional, and complete written reports of the examination, assessment, and evaluation shall be forwarded to the commissioner by the chief officer who recommends the transfer. The reports and the chief officer's recommendation shall each include a certification that the transfer is in the person's best interests and a statement of the reasons for the conclusion.

The chief officer, upon recommending transfer, shall immediately give personal notice of the recommendation by telephone or otherwise to the person's spouse, parent, adult child, legal guardian, or conservator, if any, and to the person. No person may be transferred less than twenty-four (24) hours after the notices required by this subdivision (b)(3) have been given, unless the person's spouse, parent, adult child, or legal guardian or conservator, if any, has agreed to the transfer or unless a diligent attempt by the chief officer to give notice is unsuccessful.

The commissioner, upon authorizing transfer, shall immediately give to the person's spouse, parent, or adult child, legal guardian or conservator, if any, the committing court, if any, and to the service recipient written notice of the decision and a complaint form for review of transfer in the circuit court under part 7 of this chapter. The person may then be transferred immediately.

If the commissioner determines, upon the recommendation of the chief officer who requests a transfer, that:

A person requires emergency care and treatment that cannot be provided by the transferring facility; and

The transfer is in the person’s best interest, the commissioner may authorize the person to be transferred immediately to another department facility. The person may be transferred to a secure facility, if, and only if, in addition, the commissioner determines that the person is substantially likely to injure such person or others if not treated in a secure facility.

If the commissioner approves the emergency transfer, the commissioner shall notify the chief officers of the transferring and receiving facilities. The chief officer of the transferring facility shall then have the person transferred immediately. A bed shall remain open at the transferring facility for seventy-two (72) hours after the transfer for the readmission of the person.

Within seventy-two (72) hours after the transfer, the chief officer of the receiving facility shall determine whether the transfer was appropriate. If the chief officer determines that the transfer was not appropriate, the chief officer shall return the person to the sending facility. If the chief officer determines that the transfer was appropriate, the chief officer shall immediately give the person written notice of the decision.

The transfer shall not exceed thirty (30) days, after which the chief officer shall return the person to the facility from which the person came.

If the chief officer of the receiving facility determines that the person requires treatment beyond the thirty-day period, the chief officer shall notify the person in writing and apply for indeterminate transfer under subsection (b). The person shall remain in the receiving facility unless the commissioner denies the application for transfer. If the commissioner denies the application, the chief officer of the receiving facility shall have the person transferred to the sending facility immediately.

A person may be transferred from a state facility to a licensed private facility or from a licensed private facility to a state facility, upon proper application, approval of the sending and receiving facilities, and written notice to the committing court, if the person is committed. Once transferred, the person is lawfully admitted to the receiving facility, and the facility may retain the person under the authority of the admission or order applicable to the facility from which the person was transferred.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 4(a); 1974, ch. 802, § 22; 1975, ch. 248, § 7; modified; Acts 1976, ch. 763, § 1; Acts 1978, ch. 533, § 4; T.C.A., § 33-309; Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 4; 2000, ch. 947, §§ 1, 6; 2009, ch. 531, § 35.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 3, §§ 33-3-101 — 33-3-112, 33-3-201 — 33-3-203, 33-3-301 — 33-3-303, 33-3-401 — 33-3-412, 33-3-501 — 504, 33-3-601 — 33-3-603, 33-3-605 — 33-3-19, 33-3-623, 33-3-701 — 33-3-711, 33-3-801, 33-3-901 — 33-3-908 (Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, §§ 4-7, 16-19, 23-26; 1974, ch. 802, §§ 17-20, 22-25, 29-32; 1975, ch. 248, §§ 1, 5-7, 11; 1976, ch. 489, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 763, §§ 1, 2, 10; 1977, ch. 482, § 11; 1978, ch. 533, §§ 3-5; 1978, ch. 533, § 7; 1978, ch. 877, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 366, § 15; 1980, ch. 838, § 5; 1983, ch. 323, § 4-7, 9, 12, 15, 16; T.C.A. §§ 33-303 — 33-307, 33-309 — 33-312, 33-317 — 33-320, 33-330 — 33-337, 33-345 — 33-347, 33-355, 33-360 — 33-362, 33-364 — 33-378, 33-382, 33-610, 33-1101; Acts 1984, ch. 922, §§ 2-5, 7, 16-23, 34; 1984, ch. 986, §§ 1, 2; 1985, ch. 437, §§ 6-13, 33; 1986, ch. 570, §§ 2-4; 1986, ch. 836, § 3, 5; 1987, ch. 143, §§ 2, 3, 7; 1988, ch. 828, § 1; 1989, ch. 278, §§ 30-33; 1989, ch. 513, §§ 2, 5-13; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 29-31, 113; 1992, ch. 991, § 13; 1993, ch. 66, § 44; 1993, ch. 439, § 1; 1993, ch. 356, § 4; 1994, ch. 630, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 743, § 1; 1995, ch. 320, § 1; 1995, ch. 411, § 1; 1996, ch. 669, § 1; 1996, ch. 675, § 15; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 31-47, 49-56; 2000, ch. 947, § 6); § 33-3-304 (Acts 1974, ch. 464, § 1; 1975, ch. 248, § 20; T.C.A., § 33-702), which was previously repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-604 (Acts 1983, ch. 323, § 9; T.C.A., § 33-363), which was repealed by Acts 1984, ch. 922, § 33; § 33-3-620, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(e) and (f) in 1984; § 33-3-621, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(g) in 1984; and § 33-3-622, which was previously transferred to § 33-6-104(h) in 1984, is deleted and replaced in the revision of title 33 by Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1, effective March 1, 2001.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

Cross-References. Judicial procedures for review of transfers, title 33, ch. 3, part 7.

33-3-302. Transfer to veterans' administration facilities.

Upon receipt of a certificate of the veterans' administration that facilities are available for the care or treatment of a person ordered hospitalized pursuant to chapter 6, part 5 of this title, in any hospital for the care or treatment of persons with mental illness or serious emotional disturbance and that the person is eligible for care or treatment in a veterans' hospital or facility of the agency located in this state, the commissioner may cause the person's transfer to the veterans' hospital or facility of the United States for hospitalization in this state. No person shall be transferred to a veterans' hospital or facility of the United States if the person is confined based on conviction of a criminal offense, or if the person has been acquitted of the charge solely on the ground of mental illness, unless prior to the transfer, the court originally ordering confinement of the person enters an order for the transfer after appropriate motion and hearing. A person transferred to a veterans' hospital or facility shall be considered to be hospitalized by the veterans' administration of the United States under the original order of hospitalization.

Acts 1965, ch. 38, § 4(b); T.C.A., § 33-610; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

33-3-303. Transfer of nonresident.

The commissioner may provide for and authorize the transportation and transfer from this state to the service recipient's state of residence of a person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability who is a resident of a state not party to the Interstate Compact on Mental Health, codified in § 33-9-201, if the nonparty state has reciprocal statutes conferring similar authority and if the service recipient meets the applicable standards for service under this title other than any requirement of being a state resident.

Subject to the availability of suitable accommodations, a nonresident person with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disability may be hospitalized or admitted under this title for observation, diagnosis and treatment, but in no case for a period longer than thirty (30) days, pending transfer to the state of residence.

However, the commissioner may designate certain nonresident persons with mental illness, serious emotional disturbance, or developmental disabilities, not to exceed a total of one hundred (100), as “commissioner's service recipients,” who because of their nonresident status in Tennessee are not entitled to hospitalization or admission in this state, but who, having families residing in the state, may be eligible for psychiatric hospitalization or admission, care and treatment for compassionate reasons.

Acts 1955, ch. 187, § 1; 1965, ch. 38, § 26; 1965, ch. 295, § 1; 1974, ch. 802, § 32; 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 33-319, 33-1101; Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 1.

Collateral References.

Right of state or its political subdivision to maintain action in another state for support and maintenance of defendant's child, parent, or dependent in plaintiff's institution. 67 A.L.R.2d 771.